Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,142
Report to department; discrimination or retaliation prohibited; action for relief authorized.

An individual or a business credentialed pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act shall not discriminate or retaliate against any person who has initiated or participated in the making of a report under the act to the department. Such person may maintain an action for any type of relief, including injunctive and declaratory relief, permitted by law.

Laws 2016, LB750, § 2.